District of Columbia statutes.
44-1638

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 467; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(a) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(a) ) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-69, § 9, 54 DCR 11650

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act of 2007.

Editor's Notes